Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-603
Property acquired; presumption.

Property acquired, as defined in section 42-617, shall not be regarded as community property unless the contrary be satisfactorily proved.

Laws 1947, c. 156, § 3, p. 427;

Laws 1949, c. 129, § 2, p. 337.

Declaratory judgment seeking to declare Community Property Act unconstitutional was dismissed because of lack of proper parties and justiciable issues. Miller v. Stolinski, 149 Neb. 679, 32 N.W.2d 199 (1948).